Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.08
Uniformity of interpretation.

The Nebraska Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 8.